Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.185

Rescission of transaction—Requirements—Notice.

(1) In addition to any other rights and remedies a purchaser may have, the purchaser of a hearing instrument shall have the right to rescind the transaction for other than the licensed hearing aid specialist, licensed audiologist, or interim permit holder's breach if:

(a) The purchaser, for reasonable cause, returns the hearing instrument or holds it at the licensed hearing aid specialist, licensed audiologist, or interim permit holder's disposal, if the hearing instrument is in its original condition less normal wear and tear. "Reasonable cause" shall be defined by the board but shall not include a mere change of mind on the part of the purchaser or a change of mind related to cosmetic concerns of the purchaser about wearing a hearing instrument; and

(b) The purchaser sends notice of the cancellation by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the establishment employing the licensed hearing aid specialist, licensed audiologist, or interim permit holder at the time the hearing instrument was originally purchased, and the notice is posted not later than thirty days following the date of delivery, but the purchaser and the licensed hearing aid specialist, licensed audiologist, or interim permit holder may extend the deadline for posting of the notice of rescission by mutual, written agreement. In the event the hearing instrument develops a problem which qualifies as a reasonable cause for recision or which prevents the purchaser from evaluating the hearing instrument, and the purchaser notifies the establishment employing the licensed hearing aid specialist, licensed audiologist, or interim permit holder of the problem during the thirty days following the date of delivery and documents such notification, the deadline for posting the notice of rescission shall be extended by an equal number of days as those between the date of the notification of the problem to the date of notification of availability for redeliveries. Where the hearing instrument is returned to the licensed hearing aid specialist, licensed audiologist, or interim permit holder for any inspection for modification or repair, and the licensed hearing aid specialist, licensed audiologist, or interim permit holder has notified the purchaser that the hearing instrument is available for redelivery, and where the purchaser has not responded by either taking possession of the hearing instrument or instructing the licensed hearing aid specialist, licensed audiologist, or interim permit holder to forward it to the purchaser, then the deadline for giving notice of the recision shall extend no more than seven working days after this notice of availability.

(2) If the transaction is rescinded under this section or as otherwise provided by law and the hearing instrument is returned to the licensed hearing aid specialist, licensed audiologist, or interim permit holder, the licensed hearing aid specialist, licensed audiologist, or interim permit holder shall refund to the purchaser any payments or deposits for that hearing instrument. However, the licensed hearing aid specialist, licensed audiologist, or interim permit holder may retain, for each hearing instrument, fifteen percent of the total purchase price or one hundred twenty-five dollars, whichever is less. After December 31, 1996, the recision amount shall be determined by the board. The licensed hearing aid specialist, licensed audiologist, or interim permit holder shall also return any goods traded in contemplation of the sale, less any costs incurred by the licensed hearing aid specialist, licensed audiologist, or interim permit holder in making those goods ready for resale. The refund shall be made within ten business days after the rescission. The buyer shall incur no additional liability for such rescission.

(3) For the purposes of this section, the purchaser shall have recourse against the bond held by the establishment entering into a purchase agreement with the buyer, as provided by RCW 18.35.240.

[ 2014 c 189 s 14; 2002 c 310 s 19; 1998 c 142 s 13; 1996 c 200 s 25; 1993 c 313 s 9; 1989 c 198 s 12.]

NOTES:

Work group—2014 c 189: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Effective date—2002 c 310: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Effective date—1998 c 142 ss 1-14 and 16-20: See note following RCW 18.35.010.